District of Columbia statutes.
29-107.03

Uniformity or consistency of application and construction.

In applying and construing the chapters of this title based on uniform or model acts, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity or consistency of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720